California statutes. Civil Code
(5) Information that is collected, used, or disclosed in research, as defined in Section 164.501 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including, but not limited to, a clinical trial, and that is conducted in accordance with applicable ethics, confidentiality, privacy, and security rules of Part 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human Subjects, also known as the Common Rule, good clinical practice guidelines issued by the International Council for Harmonisation, or human subject protection requirements of the United States Food and Drug Administration. 

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) “Business associate” has
 the same meaning as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Covered entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) “Identifiable private information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 46.102 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) “Individually identifiable health information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) “Medical information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 56.05.

(6) “Patient information” shall mean identifiable private information, protected health information, individually
 identifiable health information, or medical information.

(7) “Protected health information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(8) “Provider of health care” has the same meaning as defined in Section 56.05.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 172, Sec. 2.   (AB 713)   Effective September 25, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.148.

(a) A business or other person shall not reidentify, or attempt to reidentify, information that has met the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.146, except for one or more of the following purposes: 

(1) Treatment, payment, or health care operations conducted by a covered entity or business associate acting on behalf of, and at the written direction of, the covered entity. For purposes of
 this paragraph, “treatment,” “payment,” “health care operations,” “covered entity,” and “business associate” have the same meaning as defined in Section 164.501 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Public health activities or purposes as described in Section 164.512 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Research, as defined in Section 164.501 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that is conducted in accordance with Part 46 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human Subjects, also known as the Common Rule.

(4) Pursuant to a contract where the lawful holder of the deidentified information that met the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.146 expressly engages a person or entity to attempt to
 reidentify the deidentified information in order to conduct testing, analysis, or validation of deidentification, or related statistical techniques, if the contract bans any other use or disclosure of the reidentified information and requires the return or destruction of the information that was reidentified upon completion of the contract.

(5) If otherwise required by law.

(b) In accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.146, information reidentified pursuant this section shall be subject to applicable federal and state data privacy and security laws including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act, and this title.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2021, any contract for the sale or license of deidentified information
 that has met the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.146, where one of the parties is a person residing or doing business in the state, shall include the following, or substantially similar, provisions:

(1) A statement that the deidentified information being sold or licensed includes deidentified patient information.

(2) A statement that reidentification, and attempted reidentification, of the deidentified information by the purchaser or licensee of the information is prohibited pursuant to this section.

(3) A requirement that, unless otherwise required by law, the purchaser or licensee of the deidentified information may not further disclose the deidentified information to any third party unless the third party is contractually bound by the same or stricter restrictions and conditions.
 

(d) For purposes of this section, “reidentify” means the process of reversal of deidentification techniques, including, but not limited to, the addition of specific pieces of information or data elements that can, individually or in combination, be used to uniquely identify an individual or usage of any statistical method, contrivance, computer software, or other means that have the effect of associating deidentified information with a specific identifiable individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 172, Sec. 3.   (AB 713)   Effective September 25, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.150.

Personal Information Security Breaches

(a) (1) Any consumer whose nonencrypted and nonredacted personal information, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 1798.81.5, or whose email address in combination with a password or security question and answer that would permit access to the account is subject to an unauthorized access and exfiltration, theft, or disclosure as a result of the business’
 violation of the duty to implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information to protect the personal information may institute a civil action for any of the following:

(A) To recover damages in an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not greater than seven hundred and fifty ($750) per consumer per incident or actual damages, whichever is greater. The amounts in this subdivision shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1798.199.95.

(B) Injunctive or declaratory relief.

(C) Any other relief the court deems proper.

(2) In assessing the amount of statutory
 damages, the court shall consider any one or more of the relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct, and the defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(b) Actions pursuant to this section may be brought by a consumer if, prior to initiating any action against a business for statutory damages on an individual or class-wide basis, a consumer provides a business 30 days’ written notice identifying the specific provisions of this title the consumer alleges have been or are being violated. In the event a cure is possible, if within the 30 days the business actually cures the noticed
 violation and provides the consumer an express written statement that the violations have been cured and that no further violations shall occur, no action for individual statutory damages or class-wide statutory damages may be initiated against the business. The implementation and maintenance of reasonable security procedures and practices pursuant to Section 1798.81.5 following a breach does not constitute a cure with respect to that breach. No notice shall be required prior to an individual consumer initiating an action solely for actual pecuniary damages suffered as a result of the alleged violations of this title. If a business continues to violate this title in breach of the express written statement provided to the consumer under this section, the consumer may initiate an action against the business to enforce the written statement and may pursue statutory damages for each breach of the
 express written statement, as well as any other violation of the title that postdates the written statement.

(c) The cause of action established by this section shall apply only to violations as defined in subdivision (a) and shall not be based on violations of any other section of this title. Nothing in this title shall be interpreted to serve as the basis for a private right of action under any other law. This shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under other law or the United States or California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 121, Sec. 6.   (AB 3286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.155.

Administrative Enforcement

(a) Any business, service provider, contractor, or other person that violates this title shall be liable for an administrative fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation or seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each intentional violation or violations involving the personal information of consumers whom the business, service provider, contractor, or other person has actual knowledge are under 16 years of age, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1798.199.95, in an administrative enforcement action brought by the California Privacy Protection Agency.

(b) (1) Ninety-five percent of any administrative fine assessed for a violation of this title, and of the proceeds of any settlement of an action brought pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be deposited into the Consumer Privacy Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1798.160, and shall be used exclusively by the California Privacy Protection Agency in carrying out its duties under this title.

(2) Five percent of any administrative fine assessed for a violation of this title, and of the proceeds of any settlement of an action brought pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be deposited into the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1798.160.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.160.

Consumer Privacy Fund

(a) (1) A special fund to be known as the “Consumer Privacy Fund” is hereby created within the General Fund in the State Treasury, and is available upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(2) Funds in the Consumer Privacy Fund and all subfunds within the fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes described in this section and shall not be subject to appropriation or transfer by the Legislature for any other purpose. Any interest and earnings from the fund and all subfunds within the fund shall be transferred on an annual basis to the State Treasury to be available in the General Fund for
 appropriation by the Legislature.

(b) (1) The Consumer Privacy Subfund is hereby created within the Consumer Privacy Fund and is available upon appropriation by the Legislature. Funds in the Consumer Privacy Subfund shall be used exclusively for the purposes described in this subdivision.

(2) Ninety-five percent of any administrative fine recovered in an action brought by the California Privacy Protection Agency for a violation of this title shall be deposited into the Consumer Privacy Subfund and shall be used exclusively by the California Privacy Protection Agency in carrying out its duties under this title.

(c) (1) The Attorney General Consumer Privacy Enforcement Subfund is hereby created within the Consumer Privacy Fund and is available upon appropriation by the
 Legislature. Funds in the Attorney General Consumer Privacy Enforcement Subfund shall be used exclusively for the purposes described in this subdivision.

(2) Ninety-five percent of any civil penalty recovered in an action brought by the Attorney General for a violation of this title shall be deposited into the Attorney General Consumer Privacy Enforcement Subfund and shall be used exclusively by the Attorney General in carrying out its duties under this title.

(d) The Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund is hereby created within the Consumer Privacy Fund and is available upon appropriation by the Legislature. Funds in the Consumer Privacy Subfund shall be used exclusively for the purposes described in this subdivision.

(1) (A) Five percent of any administrative fine recovered in an action brought by
 the California Privacy Protection Agency for a violation of this title shall be deposited into the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund.

(B) Five percent of any civil penalty recovered in an action brought by the Attorney General for a violation of this title shall be deposited into the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund.

(2) (A) Funds deposited into the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund shall be used exclusively by the California Privacy Protection Agency to administer and distribute grants to promote and protect consumer privacy, educate children in the area of online privacy, and fund cooperative programs with international law enforcement organizations to combat fraudulent activities with respect to consumer data breaches.

(B) Subject to subparagraph (A), the California Privacy Protection Agency shall make grants from the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund by distributing one-third of the amount allocated for grant funding in the subfund to each of the following grant recipients:

(i) Nonprofit organizations to promote and protect consumer privacy.

(ii) Nonprofit organizations and public agencies, including school districts, to educate children in the area of online privacy.

(iii) State and local law enforcement agencies to fund cooperative programs with international law enforcement organizations to combat fraudulent activities with respect to consumer data breaches.

(3) (A) The California Privacy Protection Agency shall begin administering the grant program described in paragraph (2) when the amount of funds in the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund exceeds three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).

(B) In a fiscal year in which the amount of funds in the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund is equal to or less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000), the funds shall remain in the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund until the total funds exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).

(e) Any remaining funds in the Consumer Privacy Fund and subfunds within the fund that were not appropriated as part of the 2025 Budget Act shall be transferred on a one-time basis in the 2025–26 fiscal year as follows:

(1) Forty-five percent of the remaining funds shall be transferred to the Consumer Privacy Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Forty-five percent of the remaining funds shall be
 transferred to the Attorney General Consumer Privacy Enforcement Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) Ten percent of the remaining funds shall be transferred to the Consumer Privacy Grant Subfund created within the Consumer Privacy Fund pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1798.160.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 2.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.175.

Conflicting Provisions

This title is intended to further the constitutional right of privacy and to supplement existing laws relating to consumers’ personal information, including, but not limited to, Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 22575) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code and Title 1.81 (commencing with Section 1798.80). The provisions of this title are not limited to information collected electronically or over the Internet, but apply to the collection and sale of all personal information collected by a business from consumers. Wherever possible, law relating to consumers’ personal information should be construed to
 harmonize with the provisions of this title, but in the event of a conflict between other laws and the provisions of this title, the provisions of the law that afford the greatest protection for the right of privacy for consumers shall control.

(History: Amended November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 19.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.180.

Preemption

This title is a matter of statewide concern and supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a city, county, city and county, municipality, or local agency regarding the collection and sale of consumers’ personal information by a business.

(History: Amended November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 20.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.185.

Regulations

(a) On or before July 1, 2020, the Attorney General shall solicit broad public participation and adopt regulations to further the purposes of this title, including, but not limited to, the following areas:

(1) Updating or adding categories of personal information to those enumerated in subdivision (c) of Section 1798.130 and subdivision (v) of Section 1798.140, and updating or adding categories of sensitive personal information to those enumerated in subdivision (ae) of Section 1798.140 in order to address changes in technology, data collection practices, obstacles to implementation, and privacy concerns.

(2) Updating as needed the definitions
 of “deidentified” and “unique identifier” to address changes in technology, data collection, obstacles to implementation, and privacy concerns, and adding, modifying, or deleting categories to the definition of designated methods for submitting requests to facilitate a consumer’s ability to obtain information from a business pursuant to Section 1798.130. The authority to update the definition of “deidentified” shall not apply to deidentification standards set forth in Section 164.514 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, where such information previously was “protected health information” as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Establishing any exceptions necessary to comply with state or federal law, including, but not limited to, those relating to trade secrets and intellectual property rights, within one year of passage of this title and as needed thereafter, with the intention that trade
 secrets should not be disclosed in response to a verifiable consumer request.

(4) Establishing rules and procedures for the following:

(A) To facilitate and govern the submission of a request by a consumer to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information pursuant to Section 1798.120 and to limit the use of a consumer’s sensitive personal information pursuant to Section 1798.121 to ensure that consumers have the ability to exercise their choices without undue burden and to prevent business from engaging in deceptive or harassing conduct, including in retaliation against consumers for exercising their rights, while allowing businesses to inform consumers of the consequences of their decision to opt out of the sale or sharing of their personal information or to limit the use of their sensitive personal information.

(B) To govern business compliance with a consumer’s opt-out request.

(C) For the development and use of a recognizable and uniform opt-out logo or button by all businesses to promote consumer awareness of the opportunity to opt out of the sale of personal information.

(5) Establishing rules, procedures, and any exceptions necessary to ensure that the notices and information that businesses are required to provide pursuant to this title are provided in a manner that may be easily understood by the average consumer, are accessible to consumers with disabilities, and are available in the language primarily used to interact with the consumer, including establishing rules and guidelines regarding financial incentives within one year of passage of this title and as needed thereafter.

(6) Establishing rules and
 procedures to further the purposes of Sections 1798.105, 1798.106, 1798.110, and 1798.115 and to facilitate a consumer’s or the consumer’s authorized agent’s ability to delete personal information, correct inaccurate personal information pursuant to Section 1798.106, or obtain information pursuant to Section 1798.130, with the goal of minimizing the administrative burden on consumers, taking into account available technology, security concerns, and the burden on the business, to govern a business’ determination that a request for information received from a consumer is a verifiable consumer request, including treating a request submitted through a password-protected account maintained by the consumer with the business while the consumer is logged into the account as a verifiable consumer request and providing a mechanism for a consumer who does not maintain an account with the business to request information through the business’ authentication of the consumer’s identity, within one year of passage of this
 title and as needed thereafter.

(7) Establishing how often, and under what circumstances, a consumer may request a correction pursuant to Section 1798.106, including standards governing the following:

(A) How a business responds to a request for correction, including exceptions for requests to which a response is impossible or would involve disproportionate effort, and requests for correction of accurate information.

(B) How concerns regarding the accuracy of the information may be resolved.

(C) The steps a business may take to prevent fraud.

(D) If a business rejects a request to correct personal information collected and analyzed concerning a consumer’s health, the right of a consumer to
 provide a written addendum to the business with respect to any item or statement regarding any such personal information that the consumer believes to be incomplete or incorrect. The addendum shall be limited to 250 words per alleged incomplete or incorrect item and shall clearly indicate in writing that the consumer requests the addendum to be made a part of the consumer’s record.

(8) Establishing the standard to govern a business’ determination, pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.130, that providing information beyond the 12-month period in a response to a verifiable consumer request is impossible or would involve a disproportionate effort.

(9) Issuing regulations further defining and adding to the business purposes, including other notified purposes, for which businesses, service providers, and contractors may use consumers’
 personal information consistent with consumers’ expectations, and further defining the business purposes for which service providers and contractors may combine consumers’ personal information obtained from different sources, except as provided for in paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 1798.140.

(10) Issuing regulations identifying those business purposes, including other notified purposes, for which service providers and contractors may use consumers’ personal information received pursuant to a written contract with a business, for the service provider or contractor’s own business purposes, with the goal of maximizing consumer privacy.

(11) Issuing regulations to further define “intentionally interacts,” with the goal of maximizing consumer privacy.

(12) Issuing regulations to further define “precise
 geolocation,” including if the size defined is not sufficient to protect consumer privacy in sparsely populated areas or when the personal information is used for normal operational purposes, including billing.

(13) Issuing regulations to define the term “specific pieces of information obtained from the consumer” with the goal of maximizing a consumer’s right to access relevant personal information while minimizing the delivery of information to a consumer that would not be useful to the consumer, including system log information and other technical data. For delivery of the most sensitive personal information, the regulations may require a higher standard of authentication provided that the agency shall monitor the impact of the higher standard on the right of consumers to obtain their personal information to ensure that the requirements of verification do not result in the unreasonable denial of verifiable consumer requests.

(14) Issuing regulations requiring businesses whose processing of consumers’ personal information presents significant risk to consumers’ privacy or security, to:

(A) Perform a cybersecurity audit on an annual basis, including defining the scope of the audit and establishing a process to ensure that audits are thorough and independent. The factors to be considered in determining when processing may result in significant risk to the security of personal information shall include the size and complexity of the business and the nature and scope of processing activities.

(B) Submit to the California Privacy Protection Agency on a regular basis a risk assessment with respect to their processing of personal information, including whether the processing involves sensitive personal information, and identifying and weighing the
 benefits resulting from the processing to the business, the consumer, other stakeholders, and the public, against the potential risks to the rights of the consumer associated with that processing, with the goal of restricting or prohibiting the processing if the risks to privacy of the consumer outweigh the benefits resulting from processing to the consumer, the business, other stakeholders, and the public. Nothing in this section shall require a business to divulge trade secrets.

(15) Issuing regulations governing access and opt-out rights with respect to a business’ use of automated decisionmaking technology, including profiling and requiring a business’ response to access requests to include meaningful information about the logic involved in those decisionmaking processes, as well as a description of the likely outcome of the process with respect to the consumer.

(16) Issuing
 regulations to further define a “law enforcement agency-approved investigation” for purposes of the exception in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.145.

(17) Issuing regulations to define the scope and process for the exercise of the agency’s audit authority, to establish criteria for selection of persons to audit, and to protect consumers’ personal information from disclosure to an auditor in the absence of a court order, warrant, or subpoena.

(18) (A) Issuing regulations to define the requirements and technical specifications for an opt-out preference signal sent by a platform, technology, or mechanism, to indicate a consumer’s intent to opt out of the sale or sharing of the consumer’s personal information and to limit the use or disclosure of the consumer’s sensitive personal information. The requirements and
 specifications for the opt-out preference signal should be updated from time to time to reflect the means by which consumers interact with businesses, and should:

(i) Ensure that the manufacturer of a platform or browser or device that sends the opt-out preference signal cannot unfairly disadvantage another business.

(ii) Ensure that the opt-out preference signal is consumer-friendly, clearly described, and easy to use by an average consumer and does not require that the consumer provide additional information beyond what is necessary.

(iii) Clearly represent a consumer’s intent and be free of defaults constraining or presupposing that intent.

(iv) Ensure that the opt-out preference signal does not conflict with other commonly used privacy settings or
 tools that consumers may employ.

(v) Provide a mechanism for the consumer to selectively consent to a business’ sale of the consumer’s personal information, or the use or disclosure of the consumer’s sensitive personal information, without affecting the consumer’s preferences with respect to other businesses or disabling the opt-out preference signal globally.

(vi) State that in the case of a page or setting view that the consumer accesses to set the opt-out preference signal, the consumer should see up to three choices, including:

(I) Global opt out from sale and sharing of personal information, including a direction to limit the use of sensitive personal information.

(II) Choice to “Limit the Use of My Sensitive Personal Information.”

(III) Choice titled “Do Not Sell/Do Not Share My Personal Information for Cross-Context Behavioral Advertising.”

(B) Issuing regulations to establish technical specifications for an opt-out preference signal that allows the consumer, or the consumer’s parent or guardian, to specify that the consumer is less than 13 years of age or at least 13 years of age and less than 16 years of age.

(C) Issuing regulations, with the goal of strengthening consumer privacy while considering the legitimate operational interests of businesses, to govern the use or disclosure of a consumer’s sensitive personal information, notwithstanding the consumer’s direction to limit the use or disclosure of the consumer’s sensitive personal information, including:

(i) Determining any
 additional purposes for which a business may use or disclose a consumer’s sensitive personal information.

(ii) Determining the scope of activities permitted under paragraph (8) of subdivision (e) of Section 1798.140, as authorized by subdivision (a) of Section 1798.121, to ensure that the activities do not involve health-related research.

(iii) Ensuring the functionality of the business’ operations.

(iv) Ensuring that the exemption in subdivision (d) of Section 1798.121 for sensitive personal information applies to information that is collected or processed incidentally, or without the purpose of inferring characteristics about a consumer, while ensuring that businesses do not use the exemption for the purpose of evading consumers’ rights to limit the use and disclosure of their sensitive personal information under
 Section 1798.121.

(19) Issuing regulations to govern how a business that has elected to comply with subdivision (b) of Section 1798.135 responds to the opt-out preference signal and provides consumers with the opportunity subsequently to consent to the sale or sharing of their personal information or the use and disclosure of their sensitive personal information for purposes in addition to those authorized by subdivision (a) of Section 1798.121. The regulations should:

(A) Strive to promote competition and consumer choice and be technology neutral.

(B) Ensure that the business does not respond to an opt-out preference signal by:

(i) Intentionally degrading the functionality of the consumer experience.

(ii) Charging the consumer a fee in response to the consumer’s opt-out preferences.

(iii) Making any products or services not function properly or fully for the consumer, as compared to consumers who do not use the opt-out preference signal.

(iv) Attempting to coerce the consumer to opt in to the sale or sharing of the consumer’s personal information, or the use or disclosure of the consumer’s sensitive personal information, by stating or implying that the use of the opt-out preference signal will adversely affect the consumer as compared to consumers who do not use the opt-out preference signal, including stating or implying that the consumer will not be able to use the business’ products or services or that those products or services may not function properly or fully.

(v) Displaying any notification or
 popup in response to the consumer’s opt-out preference signal.

(C) Ensure that any link to a web page or its supporting content that allows the consumer to consent to opt in:

(i) Is not part of a popup, notice, banner, or other intrusive design that obscures any part of the web page the consumer intended to visit from full view or that interferes with or impedes in any way the consumer’s experience visiting or browsing the web page or internet website the consumer intended to visit.

(ii) Does not require or imply that the consumer must click the link to receive full functionality of any products or services, including the internet website.

(iii) Does not make use of any dark patterns.

(iv) Applies only to the business with which the consumer intends to interact.

(D) Strive to curb coercive or deceptive practices in response to an opt-out preference signal but should not unduly restrict businesses that are trying in good faith to comply with Section 1798.135.

(20) Review existing Insurance Code provisions and regulations relating to consumer privacy, except those relating to insurance rates or pricing, to determine whether any provisions of the Insurance Code provide greater protection to consumers than the provisions of this title. Upon completing its review, the agency shall adopt a regulation that applies only the more protective provisions of this title to insurance companies. For the purpose of clarity, the Insurance Commissioner shall have jurisdiction over insurance rates and pricing.

(21) Harmonizing the regulations governing opt-out mechanisms, notices to consumers, and other operational mechanisms in this title to promote clarity and the functionality of this title for consumers.

(b) The Attorney General may adopt additional regulations as necessary to further the purposes of this title.

(c) The Attorney General shall not bring an enforcement action under this title until six months after the publication of the final regulations issued pursuant to this section or July 1, 2020, whichever is sooner.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the timeline for adopting final regulations required by the act adding this subdivision shall be July 1, 2022. Beginning the later of July 1, 2021, or six months after the agency provides notice to the Attorney General that it is prepared to begin
 rulemaking under this title, the authority assigned to the Attorney General to adopt regulations under this section shall be exercised by the California Privacy Protection Agency. Notwithstanding any other law, civil and administrative enforcement of the provisions of law added or amended by this act shall not commence until July 1, 2023, and shall only apply to violations occurring on or after that date. Enforcement of provisions of law contained in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 amended by this act shall remain in effect and shall be enforceable until the same provisions of this act become enforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 28.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.190.

Anti-Avoidance

A court or the agency shall disregard the intermediate steps or transactions for purposes of effectuating the purposes of this title:

(a) If a series of steps or transactions were component parts of a single transaction intended from the beginning to be taken with the intention of avoiding the reach of this title, including the disclosure of information by a business to a third party in order to avoid the definition of sell or share.

(b) If steps or transactions were taken to purposely avoid the
 definition of sell or share by eliminating any monetary or other valuable consideration, including by entering into contracts that do not include an exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration, but where a party is obtaining something of value or use.

(History: Amended November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 22.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.192.

Waiver

Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind, including a representative action waiver, that purports to waive or limit in any way rights under this title, including, but not limited to, any right to a remedy or means of enforcement, shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable. This section shall not prevent a consumer from declining to request information from a business, declining to opt out of a business’s sale of the consumer’s personal information, or authorizing a business to sell or share the consumer’s personal information after previously
 opting out.

(History: Amended November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 23.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.194.

This title shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 55, Sec. 3.   (AB 375)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 1798.198.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.196.

This title is intended to supplement federal and state law, if permissible, but shall not apply if such application is preempted by, or in conflict with, federal law or the United States or California Constitution.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 55, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 735, Sec. 15.   (SB 1121)   Effective September 23, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 1798.198.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.198.

(a) Subject to limitation provided in subdivision (b), and in Section 1798.199, this title shall be operative January 1, 2020.

(b) This title shall become operative only if initiative measure No. 17-0039, The Consumer Right to Privacy Act of 2018, is withdrawn from the ballot pursuant to Section 9604 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 55, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 735, Sec. 16.   (SB 1121)   Effective September 23, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.

Notwithstanding Section 1798.198, Section 1798.180 shall be operative on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 735, Sec. 17.   (SB 1121)   Effective September 23, 2018.   Operative September 23, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.10.

(a) There is hereby established in state government the California Privacy Protection Agency, which is vested with full administrative power, authority, and jurisdiction to implement and enforce the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018. The agency shall be governed by a five-member board, including the chairperson. The chairperson and one member of the board shall be appointed by the Governor. The Attorney General, Senate Rules
 Committee, and Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint one member. These appointments should be made from among Californians with expertise in the areas of privacy, technology, and consumer rights.

(b) The initial appointments to the agency shall be made within 90 days of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 24, Sec. 24.1.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Operative December 16, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 31 of Proposition 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.199.15.

Members of the agency board shall:

(a) Have qualifications, experience, and skills, in particular in the areas of privacy and technology, required to perform the duties of the agency and exercise its powers.
